Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5382.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 17-1-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 17-1 entitled "General
Provisions" is hereby amended to read as follows:
17-1-3. Eligibility to vote.
(a) Every citizen of the United States who is at least eighteen (18) years of age, whose
residence as defined in § 17-1-3.1 has been in this state for at least thirty (30) days, and in the town
or city and voting district in which that person desires to cast his or her vote at least thirty (30) days
next preceding the election, and who is registered in that city or town and voting district at least
thirty (30) days next preceding any election, shall be entitled to vote in the election; provided, a
person may vote in a primary election only if that person is eligible under the provisions of this
title. A person who has not registered to vote, or whose registration has been canceled pursuant to
§ 17-10-1, may cast a vote for president and vice-president on election day at the person’s city or
town hall or at an alternate location designated by the board of canvassers, and approved by the
board of elections, where such location is deemed necessary to better accommodate such voters.
The casting of that vote shall commence the process of voter registration and subject the person
voting to the requirements and penalties of this chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, any person who has
not yet reached age eighteen (18), but will be age eighteen (18) at the time of a general election,
may vote in a primary election, in which candidates are nominated for a general or special election.
(c) The provisions of subsection (b) shall not extend to any other elections.

(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, any city or town with
an elected school committee may provide by ordinance, referendum, or other mechanism at the
municipality’s discretion, that every citizen of the city or town, who is at least sixteen (16) years
of age, and whose residence as defined in this section, has been in this state for at least thirty (30)
days, may register to vote in school committee elections in the city or town in which they reside,
and if registered at least thirty (30) days next preceding any school committee election, is entitled
to vote in said election.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001121
========
LC001121 - Page 2 of 3